Indiana, session 2026, SB115.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-27-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.85-2013,
SECTION 71, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this section, "advisory board"
refers to the driver education advisory board established by subsection
(b).
(b) The driver education advisory board is established to advise the
commissioner in the administration of the policies of the commission
and the bureau regarding driver education.
(c) The advisory board is composed of seven (7) individuals
appointed by the commissioner as follows:
(1) Three (3) members must be driver education professionals
endorsed by the bureau under section 8 of this chapter. In the
selection of individuals for membership under this subdivision,
consideration must be given to driver education instruction
performed in urban and rural areas.
(2) One (1) member must be a traffic safety advocate.
(3) One (1) member must be a representative of the bureau.
2026 IN 115—LS 6227/DI 151


(4) One (1) member must be a representative of higher education.
(5) One (1) member must be a representative of the insurance
industry.
(d) A member of the advisory board serves a two (2) year term. A
member may not be appointed to more than two (2) consecutive full
terms. Each member serves until the member's successor is appointed
and qualified.
(e) A member of the advisory board may be removed for good
cause.
(f) A vacancy on the advisory board shall be filled by the
appointment by the commissioner of an individual to fill the position
to which the vacating member was appointed under subsection (c) for
the vacating member's unexpired term.
(g) The advisory board shall:
(1) consult with and advise the commissioner in the
administration of the policies of the commission and the bureau
regarding driver education; and
(2) suggest rules regarding the education and training of persons
to operate or drive motor vehicles or to prepare a person for an
examination or validation for a driver's license; and
(3) consult with the commissioner and the state police
department, and advise the commissioner in the
administration of the policies of the commission and the
bureau regarding driver education in:
(A) the procedures of a law enforcement officer during a
traffic stop; and
(B) the actions a person should take during a traffic stop,
including appropriate interaction with a law enforcement
officer.
(h) A member of the advisory board is not subject to liability in a
civil action for bodily injury or property damage arising from or
thought to have arisen from an action taken in good faith as a member
of the advisory board.
SECTION 2. IC 9-27-6-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. The bureau shall include in any driver
education manual published by the bureau the following:
(1) A description of the procedures of a law enforcement
officer during a traffic stop.
(2) An explanation of the actions a person should take during
a traffic stop, including appropriate interaction with a law
enforcement officer.
2026 IN 115—LS 6227/DI 151


SECTION 3. IC 9-27-6-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.150-2015,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. In addition to adopting rules under sections
6(b), 8(b), and 9(b) of this chapter, the bureau shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 concerning the following:
(1) Methods and procedures for the investigation and evaluation
of the qualifications of individuals applying for licenses under
sections 6 and 8 of this chapter.
(2) The criteria upon which to issue, deny, suspend, renew, and
revoke licenses under section 10 of this chapter, including
requirements for continuing education for instructors.
(3) Procedures for:
(A) the investigation into potential grounds for; and
(B) conduct of hearings on;
the issuance, renewal, cancellation, suspension, or revocation of
a license.
(4) Standards for classroom and in-car driver education
curriculum (including classroom instruction, Internet instruction,
and practice driving) and equipment. Classroom instruction
standards established under this subdivision must provide for
instruction about:
(A) railroad-highway grade crossing safety; and
(B) the procedure for participation in the human organ donor
program;
(C) actions to take during a traffic stop; and
(D) appropriate interaction with a law enforcement officer
during a traffic stop;
and must limit classroom instruction to students at least fifteen
(15) years of age.
(5) Limitations on the number of:
(A) hours an instructor may teach in a day; and
(B) classroom and driving hours in which a driver education
student may participate during a day.
(6) Programs to improve parental involvement in driver
education.
(7) Establishment and maintenance of standards for instructors of
driver education, including:
(A) secondary school driver education instructors;
(B) driver training school instructors; and
(C) higher education driver education instructors.
(8) Minimum hours of instruction for an approved driver
education course that include:
2026 IN 115—LS 6227/DI 151


(A) thirty (30) hours of classroom or online training; and
(B) six (6) hours of behind-the-wheel training.
2026 IN 115—LS 6227/DI 151